Utah statutes.
59-2-310.   Assessment in name of claimant as well as owner.
Real property described on the assessment book need not be described a second
time, but any person claiming the real property and a desire to be assessed
for the land may have the person's name inserted with that of the person to
whom the real property is assessed.
